dev/bm.adj.dix
<pardef n="lek/k__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r>k<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kere</l>      <r>k<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r>k<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>keste</l>     <r>k<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kest</l>      <r>k<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>k</l>         <r>k<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>k</l>         <r>k<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>k</l>         <r>k<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>k</l>         <r>k<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>k<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="s/ynke__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>unken</l>     <r>ynke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unket</l>     <r>ynke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unket</l>     <r>ynke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unkne</l>     <r>ynke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unkne</l>     <r>ynke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynkende</l>   <r>ynke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="glep/pe__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pende</l>     <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pen</l>       <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pet</l>       <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pet</l>       <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sk/yve__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>jøven</l>     <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jøvet</l>     <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jøvet</l>     <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jøvne</l>     <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jøvne</l>     <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yvende</l>    <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="overr/ekke__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>akte</l>      <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akte</l>      <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akt</l>       <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akt</l>       <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekkende</l>   <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hj/elpe__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>elpende</l>   <r>elpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulpen</l>     <r>elpe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulpet</l>     <r>elpe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulpet</l>     <r>elpe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulpne</l>     <r>elpe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulpne</l>     <r>elpe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sp/ørre__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ørrende</l>   <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urte</l>      <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urte</l>      <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ha__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kl/yve__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>øven</l>      <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øvet</l>      <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øvet</l>      <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øvne</l>      <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øvne</l>      <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yvde</l>      <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yvde</l>      <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yvd</l>       <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yvd</l>       <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yvende</l>    <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="påløp/en__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="betr/ede__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ådte</l>      <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådte</l>      <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådt</l>       <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådt</l>       <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edende</l>    <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="stett/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="fremhjelpe">      <i>fremhj</i><par n="hj/elpe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forspørre">       <i>forsp</i><par n="sp/ørre__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hjelpe">          <i>hj</i><par n="hj/elpe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avhjelpe">        <i>avhj</i><par n="hj/elpe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ha">              <i>ha</i><par n="ha__adj"/></e>
<e lm="betrede">         <i>betr</i><par n="betr/ede__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forespørre">      <i>foresp</i><par n="sp/ørre__adj"/></e>
<e lm="etterspørre">     <i>ettersp</i><par n="sp/ørre__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gleppe">          <i>glep</i><par n="glep/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bortløpen">       <i>bortløp</i><par n="påløp/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forskyve">        <i>forsk</i><par n="sk/yve__adj"/></e>
<e lm="framhjelpe">      <i>framhj</i><par n="hj/elpe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hensynke">        <i>hens</i><par n="s/ynke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="synke">           <i>s</i><par n="s/ynke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utspørre">        <i>utsp</i><par n="sp/ørre__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stette">          <i>stett</i><par n="stett/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skyve">           <i>sk</i><par n="sk/yve__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tiltrede">        <i>tiltr</i><par n="betr/ede__adj"/></e>
<e lm="spørre">          <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ørre__adj"/></e>
<e lm="terminforskyve">  <i>terminforsk</i><par n="sk/yve__adj"/></e>
<e lm="parallellforskyve"><i>parallellforsk</i><par n="sk/yve__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lekk">            <i>lek</i><par n="lek/k__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overrekke">       <i>overr</i><par n="overr/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rådspørre">       <i>rådsp</i><par n="sp/ørre__adj"/></e>
<e lm="klyve">           <i>kl</i><par n="kl/yve__adj"/></e>
<e lm="påløpen">         <i>påløp</i><par n="påløp/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overtrede">       <i>overtr</i><par n="betr/ede__adj"/></e>
